Utah statutes.
63G-7-203.   Exemptions for certain takings actions.

An action that involves takings law, as defined in Section 63L-3-102, is not subject to the requirements of Sections 63G-7-401, 63G-7-402, 63G-7-403, and 63G-7-601.

